Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-423 Share in savings. A
reciprocal insurer may from time to time return to its subscribers any savings
or credits accruing to their accounts. Any such distribution shall not
unfairly discriminate between classes of risks, or policies, or between
subscribers, but the distribution may vary as to classes of subscribers, based
upon the experience of the subscribers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next